Illinois, session 104th, SB4086.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $2,025,250, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 6the Court of Claims for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 7    Section 10. The amount of $450,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the Court of Claims 9Administration and Grant Fund to the Court of Claims for 10administrative expenses under the Crime Victims Compensation 11Act. 12    Section 15. The following named amount, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Court of Claims for 14payment of claims as follows:15For claims under the Crime Victims 16 Compensation Act:17  Payable from the Court of Claims18   Federal Grant Fund.............................$10,000,000 19    Section 20. The amount of $3,000,000, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 21Fund to the Court of Claims for payment of awards solely as a   SB4086- 2 -LRB104 20906 JRC 34628 b1result of the lapsing of an appropriation originally made from 2any funds held by the State Treasurer. 3    Section 25. The amount of $7,000,000, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 5Fund to the Court of Claims for payment of line of duty awards. 6    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 7thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Court of 8Claims for payment of claims as follows:9For claims under the Crime Victims 10 Compensation Act:11  Payable from General Revenue Fund................$7,000,00012For claims other than Crime Victims: 13 Payable from the General Revenue Fund.............40,000,00014    Total                                         $47,000,000 15    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much 16thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Court of 17Claims for payment of claims as follows:18For claims other than the Crime Victims 19 Compensation Act:20  Payable from the Road Fund.......................$1,000,00021  Payable from the DCFS Children's22   Services Fund....................................3,500,00023  Payable from the Facilities  SB4086- 3 -LRB104 20906 JRC 34628 b1  Management Fund.................................1,500,0002    Total                                          $6,000,000 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 42026.